Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.723

Medication for people living with HIV rebate revenue account.

The medication for people living with HIV rebate revenue account is created in the custody of the state treasury. The early intervention program shall deposit any receipts from pharmaceutical rebates generated by the purchase of medications with federal grant funds and revenue generated from federal grant funds for any person enrolled in the early intervention program into the account. The expenditures may only be used for services defined in the grant award from the Ryan White HIV/AIDS program. Only the secretary or the secretary's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. An appropriation is not required for expenditures. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

[ 2023 c 12 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 12: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2023." [ 2023 c 12 s 3.]